Maryland, session 2025, HB0190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
7–305.
Each hearing examiner and commissioner determining whether an incarcerated
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0190*

HOUSE BILL 190
individual is suitable for parole, and the Commission before entering into a predetermined
parole release agreement, shall consider:
(1) the circumstances surrounding the crime;
(2) the physical, mental, and moral qualifications of the incarcerated
individual;
(3) the progress of the incarcerated individual during confinement,
including the academic progress of the incarcerated individual in the mandatory education
program required under § 22–102 of the Education Article;
(4) a report on a drug or alcohol evaluation that has been conducted on the
incarcerated individual, including any recommendations concerning the incarcerated
individual’s amenability for treatment and the availability of an appropriate treatment
program;
(5) whether, TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE TOTALITY OF THE
CIRCUMSTANCES INCLUDING THE AGE OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, there is
reasonable probability that the incarcerated individual, if released on parole, will [remain
at liberty without violating the law] NOT RECIDIVATE;
(6) whether release of the incarcerated individual on parole is compatible
with [the welfare of society] PUBLIC SAFETY;
(7) an updated victim impact statement or recommendation prepared
under § 7–801 of this title;
(8) any recommendation made by the sentencing judge at the time of
sentencing;
(9) any information that is presented to a commissioner at a meeting with
the victim;
(10) any testimony presented to the Commission by the victim or the victim’s
designated representative under § 7–801 of this title; and
(11) compliance with the case plan developed under § 7–301.1 of this subtitle
or § 3–601 of this article.
7–309.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR INCAPACITATED” MEANS

HOUSE BILL 190 3
HAVING A DIAGNOSABLE MEDICAL CONDITION THAT IS UNLIKELY TO IMPROVE IN
THE FUTURE AND PREVENTS THE INDIVIDUAL FROM COMPLETING MORE THAN ONE
ACTIVITY OF DAILY LIVING, INCLUDING EATING, BREATHING, DRESSING,
GROOMING, TOILETING, WALKING, OR BATHING, WITHOUT ASSISTANCE.
(II) “CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR INCAPACITATED”
INCLUDES CONDITIONS SUCH AS DEMENTIA OR A SEVERE, PERMANENT MEDICAL OR
COGNITIVE DISABILITY IF THE CONDITION PREVENTS THE INDIVIDUAL FROM
COMPLETING MORE THAN ONE ACTIVITY OF DAILY LIVING.
(3) “TERMINAL ILLNESS” MEANS A DISEASE OR CONDITION WITH AN
END–OF–LIFE TRAJECTORY.
(B) This section applies to any incarcerated individual who is sentenced to a term
of incarceration for which all sentences being served, including any life sentence, are with
the possibility of parole.
[(b)] (C) An incarcerated individual [who is so chronically debilitated or
incapacitated by a medical or mental health condition, disease, or syndrome as to be
physically incapable of presenting a danger to society] may be released on medical parole
at any time during the term of that incarcerated individual’s sentence, without regard to
the eligibility standards specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle IF A LICENSED MEDICAL
PROFESSIONAL HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL:
(1) (I) IS CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR INCAPACITATED; OR
(II) SUFFERS FROM A TERMINAL ILLNESS; AND
(2) (I) REQUIRES EXTENDED MEDICAL MANAGEMENT WITH
HEALTH CARE NEEDS THAT WOULD BE BETTER MET BY COMMUNITY SERVICES; OR
(II) HAS BEEN RENDERED PHYSICALLY INCAPABLE OF
PRESENTING A DANGER TO SOCIETY BY A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH
CONDITION, DISEASE, OR SYNDROME.
(D) (1) THE INFORMATION TO BE CONSIDERED BY THE COMMISSION
BEFORE GRANTING MEDICAL PAROLE SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:
(I) 1. A RECOMMENDATION BY THE MEDICAL
PROFESSIONAL TREATING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER CONTRACT
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; OR
2. IF REQUESTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION, ONE MEDICAL EVALUATION CONDUCTED AT

HOUSE BILL 190
NO COST TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL BY A MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL WHO IS
INDEPENDENT FROM THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY;
(II) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL
INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S CONDITION, DISEASE, OR SYNDROME;
2. A PROGNOSIS CONCERNING THE LIKELIHOOD OF
RECOVERY FROM THE CONDITION, DISEASE, OR SYNDROME;
3. A DESCRIPTION OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S PHYSICAL INCAPACITY; AND
4. A MENTAL HEALTH EVALUATION, WHERE RELEVANT;
(III) DISCHARGE INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
1. AVAILABILITY OF TREATMENT OR PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES WITHIN THE COMMUNITY;
2. FAMILY SUPPORT WITHIN THE COMMUNITY; AND
3. HOUSING AVAILABILITY, INCLUDING HOSPITAL OR
HOSPICE CARE; AND
(IV) CASE MANAGEMENT INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
1. THE CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE CURRENT OFFENSE;
2. INSTITUTIONAL HISTORY;
3. PENDING CHARGES, SENTENCES IN OTHER
JURISDICTIONS, AND ANY OTHER DETAINERS; AND
4. CRIMINAL HISTORY INFORMATION.
(2) IF A MEDICAL EVALUATION IS REQUESTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE EVALUATION SHALL CONSIST OF AN IN–PERSON

HOUSE BILL 190 5
EXAMINATION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL GIVE EQUAL CONSIDERATION TO
THE FINDINGS OF THE EVALUATION AND ANY MEDICAL CONDITION DETAILED IN
THE EVALUATION IN CONSIDERING WHETHER TO GRANT MEDICAL PAROLE.
[(c)] (E) (1) A request for a medical parole under this section may be filed
with the Maryland Parole Commission by:
(i) the incarcerated individual seeking the medical parole;
(ii) an attorney;
(iii) a prison official or employee;
(iv) a medical professional;
(v) a family member; or
(vi) any other person.
(2) The request shall be in writing and shall articulate the grounds that
support the appropriateness of granting the medical parole.
(F) (1) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S REPRESENTATIVE MAY REQUEST A MEETING WITH THE COMMISSION.
(2) IF A REQUEST FOR A MEETING IS MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL GRANT THE REQUEST FOR A
MEETING FOR ANY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL:
1. HOUSED IN AN INFIRMARY OF A CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY;
2. CURRENTLY HOSPITALIZED OUTSIDE A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; OR
3. WHO HAS BEEN FREQUENTLY HOUSED IN AN
INFIRMARY OF A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR HOSPITALIZED OUTSIDE A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY IN THE PRECEDING 6 MONTHS; AND
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY, AT ITS DISCRETION, GRANT THE
REQUEST FOR A MEETING FOR ANY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT

HOUSE BILL 190
MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
[(d)] (G) Following review of the request, the Commission may:
(1) find the request to be inconsistent with the best interests of public
safety and take no further action; or
(2) request that [department] DEPARTMENT or local correctional facility
personnel provide information for formal consideration of parole release.
[(e) The information to be considered by the Commission before granting medical
parole shall, at a minimum, include:
(1) (i) a recommendation by the medical professional treating the
incarcerated individual under contract with the Department or local correctional facility;
or
(ii) if requested by an individual identified in subsection (c)(1) of this
section, one medical evaluation conducted at no cost to the incarcerated individual by a
medical professional who is independent from the Division of Correction or local
correctional facility;
(2) the incarcerated individual’s medical information, including:
(i) a description of the incarcerated individual’s condition, disease,
or syndrome;
(ii) a prognosis concerning the likelihood of recovery from the
condition, disease, or syndrome;
(iii) a description of the incarcerated individual’s physical incapacity
and score on the Karnofsky Performance Scale Index or similar classification of physical
impairment; and
(iv) a mental health evaluation, where relevant;
(3) discharge information, including:
(i) availability of treatment or professional services within the
community;
(ii) family support within the community; and
(iii) housing availability, including hospital or hospice care; and
(4) case management information, including:

HOUSE BILL 190 7
(i) the circumstances of the current offense;
(ii) institutional history;
(iii) pending charges, sentences in other jurisdictions, and any other
detainers; and
(iv) criminal history information.]
[(f)] (H) The Commission may require as a condition of release on medical parole
that:
(1) the parolee agree to placement for a definite or indefinite period of time
[in a hospital or hospice or other] UNDER THE CARE OF A MEDICAL PROVIDER AND IN
A housing accommodation suitable to the parolee’s medical condition, including the family
home of the parolee, as specified by the Commission or the supervising agent; and
(2) the parolee forward authentic copies of applicable medical records to
indicate that the particular medical condition giving rise to the release continues to exist.
[(g)] (I) (1) If the Commission has reason to believe that a parolee is no
longer so debilitated or incapacitated as to be physically incapable of presenting a danger
to society, the parolee shall be returned to the custody of the Division of Correction or the
local correctional facility from which the incarcerated individual was released.
(2) (i) A parole hearing for a parolee returned to custody shall be held
to consider whether the parolee remains incapacitated and shall be heard promptly.
(ii) A parolee returned to custody under this subsection shall be
maintained in custody, if the incapacitation is found to no longer exist.
(3) An incarcerated individual whose medical parole is revoked for lack of
continued incapacitation may be considered for parole in accordance with the eligibility
requirements specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle.
[(h)] (J) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “IMMINENT DEATH” MEANS DEATH
THAT IS LIKELY TO OCCUR WITHIN 6 MONTHS.
(2) Subject to paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, provisions of law
relating to victim notification and opportunity to be heard shall apply to proceedings
relating to medical parole.
[(2)] (3) In cases of imminent death, time limits relating to victim
notification and opportunity to be heard may be reduced or waived in the discretion of the
Commission.

HOUSE BILL 190
[(i) (1) If the Commission decides to grant medical parole to an incarcerated
individual sentenced to life imprisonment, the decision shall be transmitted to the
Governor.
(2) The Governor may disapprove the decision by written transmittal to
the Commission.
(3) If the Governor does not disapprove the decision within 180 days after
receipt of the written transmittal, the decision becomes effective.]
[(j)] (K) The Commission shall [issue] ADOPT regulations to implement the
provisions of this section.
7–310.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS AT LEAST 60 YEARS OLD;
(2) HAS SERVED AT LEAST 15 YEARS OF THE SENTENCE IMPOSED;
(3) IS NOT REGISTERED OR ELIGIBLE FOR SEX OFFENDER
REGISTRATION UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE
ARTICLE; AND
(4) IS SENTENCED TO A TERM OF INCARCERATION FOR WHICH ALL
SENTENCES BEING SERVED, INCLUDING ANY LIFE SENTENCE, ARE WITH THE
POSSIBILITY OF PAROLE.
(B) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL CONSIDERED FOR PAROLE UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL HAVE A PAROLE HEARING EVERY 2 YEARS.
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE FACTORS SPECIFIED UNDER § 7–305 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, EACH COMMISSION PANEL DETERMINING WHETHER AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS SUITABLE FOR PAROLE SHALL CONSIDER AND GIVE WEIGHT TO THE
AGE OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND THE IMPACT THAT THE AGE OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL HAS ON REDUCING THE RISK THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL WILL NOT RECIDIVATE.
(D) ANY SAVINGS REALIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS A RESULT OF THIS
SECTION SHALL REVERT TO THE DEPARTMENT AND SHALL BE USED FOR THE
PURPOSE OF:
(1) CONDUCTING HEARINGS FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS AS

HOUSE BILL 190 9
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PROVIDING PRERELEASE AND REENTRY CASE MANAGEMENT AND
RESOURCES FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION
AND RELEASED ON PAROLE.
(E) EVERY YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE JUSTICE
REINVESTMENT OVERSIGHT BOARD ON THE OUTCOMES OF PAROLE
CONSIDERATIONS MADE UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SUBJECT
TO THIS SECTION WHO ARE DENIED PAROLE AND RELEASED ON PAROLE;
(2) THE REASON FOR EACH DECISION TO RELEASE AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL ON PAROLE;
(3) THE REASON FOR EACH DECISION TO DENY PAROLE TO AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL;
(4) OF THE NUMBER OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
RELEASED ON PAROLE, THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE CONVICTED OF AN
OFFENSE COMMITTED AFTER RELEASE;
(5) THE AVERAGE TIME BETWEEN WHEN AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL BECOMES ELIGIBLE FOR PAROLE CONSIDERATION UNDER THIS
SECTION AND WHEN THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES THE FIRST PAROLE
HEARING REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION; AND
(6) THE AVERAGE TIME BETWEEN PAROLE HEARINGS FOR
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE A REQUIREMENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT PROVIDE ANY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION WITH INFORMATION ON THE REGULATIONS
AT LEAST ONCE EVERY YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.